North Carolina, session 2025, SB441.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-302.4 is reenacted as it existed immediately prior to its
expiration and expires effective June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 135-3(a)(8) is amended by adding a new sub-subdivision to
read:
"i. Notwithstanding sub-subdivisions c. and d. of this subdivision, the
computation of postretirement earnings under this subdivision shall
not include earnings while a beneficiary is employed as a high-need
retired teacher as defined under G.S. 115C-302.4(a) and the
beneficiary shall not be restored to service as a teacher or employee.
The Department of Public Instruction shall certify to the Retirement
System that a beneficiary is employed by a local board of education as
a high-need retired teacher. No later than September 15 annually, a
local board of education shall inform the Retirement System if it will
not employ any high-need retired teachers for that school year. The
retirement allowance of a beneficiary who retired on an early or
service retirement shall not cease due to reemployment as a high-need
retired teacher. A beneficiary reemployed as a high-need retired
teacher is not entitled to any benefits otherwise provided under this
Chapter as a result of this period of employment."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 135-3(a)(8)c1. reads as rewritten:
"c1. Within 90 days of the end of each month in which a beneficiary is
reemployed under the provisions of sub-subdivision c. or i. of this
subdivision, each employer shall provide a report for that month on
each reemployed beneficiary, including the terms of the
reemployment, the date of the reemployment, and the amount of the
monthly compensation. If the required report is not received within the
required 90 days, then the Board may do any or all of the following:
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 135-1(10) reads as rewritten:
"(10) "Employee" shall mean all full-time employees, agents or officers of the State
of North Carolina or any of its departments, bureaus and institutions other than
educational, whether such employees are elected, appointed or employed:
*S441-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Provided that the term "employee" shall not include employees of the
University of North Carolina Health Care System who are not eligible for
participation under G.S. 135-5.6, employees of the East Carolina University
School of Medicine or Dental School of Medicine who are not eligible for
participation under G.S. 135-5.7, any person who is a member of the
Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, any member of the General
Assembly or Assembly, any high-need retired teacher as defined under
G.S. 115C-302.4(a), or any part-time or temporary employee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, "employee" shall include all
employees of the General Assembly except participants in the Legislative
Intern Program, pages, and beneficiaries in receipt of a monthly retirement
allowance under this Chapter who are reemployed on a temporary basis.
"Employee" also includes any participant whose employment is interrupted
by reason of service in the Uniformed Services, as that term is defined in
section 4303(16) of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment
Rights Act, Public Law 103-353, if that participant was an employee at the
time of the interruption; if the participant does not return immediately after
that service to employment with a covered employer in this System, then the
participant shall be deemed "in service" until the date on which the participant
was first eligible to be separated or released from his or her involuntary
military service. In all cases of doubt, the Board of Trustees shall determine
whether any person is an employee as defined in this Chapter. "Employee"
shall also mean every full-time civilian employee of the North Carolina
National Guard who is employed pursuant to section 709 of Title 32 of the
United States Code and paid from federal appropriated funds, but held by the
federal authorities not to be a federal employee: Provided, however, that the
authority or agency paying the salaries of such employees shall deduct or
cause to be deducted from each employee's salary the employee's contribution
in accordance with applicable provisions of G.S. 135-8 and remit the same,
either directly or indirectly, to the Retirement System; coverage of employees
described in this sentence shall commence upon the first day of the calendar
year or fiscal year, whichever is earlier, next following the date of execution
of an agreement between the Secretary of Defense of the United States and
the Adjutant General of the State acting for the Governor in behalf of the State,
but no credit shall be allowed pursuant to this sentence for any service
previously rendered in the above-described capacity as a civilian employee of
the North Carolina National Guard: Provided, further, that the Adjutant
General, in the Adjutant General's discretion, may terminate the Retirement
System coverage of the above-described North Carolina National Guard
employees if a federal retirement system is established for such employees
and the Adjutant General elects to secure coverage of such employees under
such federal retirement system. Any full-time civilian employee of the North
Carolina National Guard described above who is now or hereafter may
become a member of the Retirement System may secure Retirement System
credit for such service as a North Carolina National Guard civilian employee
for the period preceding the time when such employees became eligible for
Retirement System coverage by paying to the Retirement System an amount
equal to that which would have constituted employee contributions if the
employee had been a member during the years of ineligibility, plus interest.
Employees of State agencies, departments, institutions, boards, and
commissions who are employed in permanent job positions on a recurring
Page 2 Senate Bill 441-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
basis must work at least 30 hours per week for nine or more months per
calendar year in order to be covered by the provisions of this subdivision. On
and after August 1, 2001, a person who is a nonimmigrant alien and who
otherwise meets the requirements of this subdivision shall not be excluded
from the definition of "employee" solely because the person holds a temporary
or time-limited visa."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 135-48.40(b)(1a) reads as rewritten:
"(1a) All retirees who (i) are meet all of the following criteria:
a. The retiree is employed by an employing unit that elects to be covered
by this subdivision, (ii) do subdivision.
b. The retiree does not qualify for coverage under subdivision (1) of this
subsection, and (iii) are subsection.
c. The retiree is either a high-need retired teacher under G.S. 115C-302.4
or is determined to be "full-time" by their employing unit in
accordance with section 4980H of the Internal Revenue Code and the
applicable regulations, as amended.
The employing unit shall pay the employer premiums for retirees who enroll
under this subdivision."
SECTION 2.(e) If the Internal Revenue Service determines that any provision of this
section jeopardizes the status of the Teachers' and State Employees' Retirement System of North
Carolina under the Internal Revenue Code, then this section is repealed on the last day of the
month following the month of receipt of that determination by the State Treasurer. Upon receipt
of that determination, the State Treasurer shall notify the Revisor of Statutes of the determination
and the date of receipt. Within three business days of receipt of the determination, the State
Treasurer shall notify all local school administrative units of the repeal of this section and shall
publicly notice the receipt of this information on the Department of State Treasurer's website.
Within three business days of receipt of the notice from the State Treasurer, a local school
administrative unit shall notify all high-need retired teachers employed by its local board of
education of the repeal of this section.
SECTION 2.(f) Any beneficiary that is employed by a local board of education as a
high-need retired teacher, as defined in G.S. 115C-302.4(a), shall not be eligible to elect into a
position that would lead the beneficiary to be eligible to accrue any additional benefits under
G.S. 135-3(a)(8). Any failure of a local board of education or a beneficiary to comply with the
foregoing shall be corrected by the Executive Director of the Retirement System as may be
appropriate under State and federal law. Any costs of the correction, as determined by the
Executive Director of the Retirement System, shall be the sole responsibility of the local board
of education and shall be transferred to the Pension Accumulation Fund under G.S. 135-8 under
rules adopted by the Board of Trustees.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and expires June 30, 2027.
Senate Bill 441-First Edition Page 3